California statutes. Education Code
School districts, community college districts, or schools or colleges within districts, may enter into cooperative or contractual arrangements with business, industry, or elements within the community for improvement of the local education program. Such arrangements may include evaluation, planning, cooperation in the operation of educational programs, and use of noncertificated personnel, including the elderly, youth, college students, and other nonprofessionals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

10403.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to modify the law with respect to experimental mathematics and reading programs established under the McAteer Act Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 54400) of Part 29 of Division 4 of Title 2 or is to be construed to authorize school districts or community college districts to contract for services required to be performed by classified school employees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

10407.

The governing board of a school district or community college district may request waiver of any section or sections of this code relating to the educational programs or administrative functions described in Section 10400 if the waiver is necessary to establish and operate a program under this chapter. The need for a waiver shall be explained and justified to the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, as the case may be, and the State Board of Education, or the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, as the case may be, may grant, in whole, or in part, any waiver request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 86.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Data-Processing Centers [10500. - 10507.]



  ARTICLE 1. Regional Data-Processing Centers [10500. - 10507.]

10500.

The governing board of a school district and a county superintendent of schools may establish and maintain educational data processing centers. Such centers that meet the requirements of Section 10504 for eligible regional educational data processing centers are entitled to financial assistance from the state for the purpose of such centers as provided herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1011.)
-------------------------------------------

10501.

A regional educational data processing center may consist of any of the following:

(a) One educational data processing center maintained by the governing board of any school district having an average daily attendance of 100,000 or more pupils.

(b) One educational data processing center maintained by the county superintendent of schools that provides data processing services to two or more school districts within or without the county, having a combined average daily attendance of not less than 100,000 nor more than 300,000 pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1011.)
-------------------------------------------

10502.

The governing board of any school district may contract with any county superintendent of schools for the rendering to the schools of the district of data processing services and may pay for the services out of any funds of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1011.)
-------------------------------------------

10503.

The functions of regional educational data-processing centers shall include the processing and reporting of information relating, among other things, to programs of instruction, school business administration, and pupil personnel data.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

10504.

An eligible regional educational data-processing center is one that meets the following requirements:

(a) It possesses equipment, personnel and funds sufficient, as determined by regulations of the State Board of Education, to convert and correlate basic source material into data-processing form by use of a basic data system.

(b) It is a regional education data-processing center as defined in Section 10501.

(c) It meets the minimum standards established by the State Board of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 87.)
-------------------------------------------

10505.

The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter, including rules and regulations that:

(a) Establish minimum standards entitling regional educational data processing centers to receive an allowance under this chapter.

(b) Prescribe the procedure by which applications for allowance pursuant to this chapter shall be governed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1011.)
-------------------------------------------

10506.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction, upon proper application therefor made by a school district or county superintendent of schools maintaining an eligible regional educational data processing center, shall allow to the applicant the amount specified in this section appropriate to the fiscal year for which the application is made.

(a) The amount of an allowance for which application may be made shall not exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for the first, twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for the second and ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the third, fiscal year for which an allowance is sought.

(b) An allowance shall be made for each of any three fiscal years for which a proper application is made by a school district or county superintendent of schools maintaining an eligible regional educational data processing center.

(c) A school district or county superintendent of schools shall not receive more than one allowance in any fiscal year nor more than three such allowances altogether.

(d) A new application shall precede such allowance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1011.)
-------------------------------------------

10507.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall make the allowances to school districts and county superintendents of schools pursuant to Section 10506 from any funds which may be provided for such purposes under any program established by or under authority of federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5. Telecommunications [10550. - 10555.]

10550.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Department of Education, in conjunction with county superintendents of schools and others from the educational community, establish telecommunication standards that will support the efficient sharing of school business and administrative information. These standards shall allow schools, school districts, county superintendents of schools, and the department to establish interactive access to this information, reduce the reporting requirements of local educational agencies, and assist local educational agencies in carrying out their financial and administrative responsibilities in a more effective manner.

(b) In addition to establishing telecommunication standards, it is the further intent of the Legislature that standardized financial information and student information being developed pursuant to Section 42103.3 and subdivision (k) of Section 51870 shall be among the initial information that is shared when telecommunication links are established.

(c) It is also the intent of the Legislature that funding be made available to encourage school districts and county superintendents of schools to connect existing networks to the telecommunication highway. The Legislature also intends that the provisions of this section be accomplished without requiring replacement of current hardware and software at the local level and that the aforementioned standards be developed and implemented without mandating specified proprietary hardware or software purchases.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 650, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

10551.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “governing board” means the governing board set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 42127.8.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that Section 10550 be implemented by the governing board.

(c) The governing board shall be supported by a team of persons having extensive experience in the development of telecommunications systems, local and statewide area computer networks, as well as knowledge of the data and system needs of school business and administration. This team shall be operated under the immediate direction and supervision of an appropriate county superintendent of schools selected, in response to an application process, by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(d) The State Department of Education shall convene a committee of volunteers, to advise the governing board. This committee shall be composed of individuals who are school district or county office of education personnel and who have knowledge of financial and administrative data processing matters. Members of the committee shall assume their own expenses for service on the committee, and the state shall not provide reimbursement for either the time served by, or the expenses of, the committee members. Two individuals shall be appointed to the committee by each of the following:

(1) The president of the California Association of School Business Officials.

(2) The president of the Association of California School Administrators.

(3) The president of the California School Boards Association.

(4) The president of the California Educational Data Processing Association.

(5) The Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 71, Sec. 6.   Effective July 5, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10552.

(a) By July 1, 1995, the governing board, with the assistance of the team established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10551 and the advice of the committee established pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 10551, shall establish telecommunication standards for use by the department and by county superintendents of schools in purchasing computer hardware or software for school business and administration. The standards shall focus on the ability to process and share financial and administrative information uniformly among county superintendents of schools and school districts as well as between county superintendents of schools and the department and shall be consistent with other departmental and national standards for telecommunication. The department shall disseminate those standards to county superintendents of schools by July 15, 1995, and publish those standards in the California School Accounting Manual.

(b) Any new or replacement financial and administrative data processing or telecommunication equipment purchased by a county superintendent of schools after July 15, 1995, may meet the standards developed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Any new or replacement financial and administrative data processing or telecommunication equipment purchased by the department after July 1, 1995, may meet the standards developed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 650, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

10553.

(a) After the telecommunication standards developed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10552 are established, each county superintendent of schools shall consult with each of the school districts under its jurisdiction about its specific telecommunication needs to enable the sharing of financial and administrative data at the local level.

(b) After telecommunication standards are established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10552, each county office of education shall establish, by January 1, 1996, uniform standards for sharing financial and administrative information between school districts and the county office of education that, to the extent relevant, conform to the standards established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10552 and take into consideration the needs identified pursuant to subdivision (a). Thereafter, school districts may follow those standards when purchasing additional or replacement hardware or software for financial and administrative data processing. School districts shall not be required to replace current hardware or software as a result of the enactment of this chapter, and any decision to make a purchase is a decision of the local agency and not a mandate of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10554.

(a) In order for the governing board to carry out its responsibilities pursuant to this chapter, there is hereby established the Educational Telecommunication Fund. The Controller shall establish an account to receive and expend moneys in the fund.

(b) Moneys in the fund established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall only be available for expenditure upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(c) Moneys in the fund established pursuant to subdivision (a) may be expended by the governing board to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, for the following purposes:

(1) To support the activities of the team established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10551.

(2) To assist the school districts and county superintendents of schools in purchasing both hardware and software to allow school districts, county superintendents of schools, and the department to be linked for school business and administrative purposes. The governing board shall establish a matching share requirement that applicant school districts and county superintendents of schools must fulfill to receive those funds. It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the distribution of grants to school districts and county superintendents of schools to the widest extent possible.

(3) To provide technical assistance through county offices of education to school districts in implementing the standards established
 pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10552.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 13, Sec. 16.   (AB 104)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10555.

By March 15 of each year, the governing board shall report to the Governor, the Legislature, the State Board of Education, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and the Department of Finance on the progress that has been made to meet the objectives of this chapter, the status of activities related to meeting the objectives of this chapter, and any plan of the governing board for subsequent fiscal years to meet the objectives of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 71, Sec. 8.   Effective July 5, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. California Education Information System [10600. - 10610.]

10600.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to make complete, current, and reliable information relating to education available to the Legislature and to all public educational agencies in California at maximum efficiency and economy through statewide compatibility in the development and application of information systems and electronic data-processing techniques insofar as they relate to data required in reports to the department.

(b) It is the further intent of the Legislature to recognize the importance, and enhance the stature, of the education profession throughout the state.

(c) The
 Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) According to recent studies, there is a shortage of qualified teachers, particularly in the areas of special education, English language acquisition and development, mathematics, and science, throughout California.

(2) In order for California to remain competitive in the global economy, the Legislature recognizes the necessity of continuing to support the recruitment of individuals to the teaching profession and effective teacher preparation and professional development programs. The Legislature also recognizes the importance of quality instruction to the academic achievement of pupils and of providing each pupil in the public schools with instruction by a highly qualified teacher.

(3) State and local policymakers, local educational agencies, teachers, parents,
 and pupils all need reliable information regarding participation in the teacher workforce, teacher movement between schools and school districts, the departure of teachers from the workforce before retirement, the appropriateness of teacher assignments, and the effectiveness of teacher credentialing, preparation, induction, recruitment, and support, and would benefit from the availability of more extensive information regarding the teaching profession.

(4) Data regarding the teacher workforce is currently collected and maintained by numerous state and local educational agencies. In order for the Legislature to fulfill its intent in enacting this chapter, it is necessary to integrate the data collected by those existing data systems to provide an understanding of the teacher workforce in the state and the effectiveness of teacher preparation programs. For purposes of integrating data regarding the teacher workforce in the state, Item
 6110-001-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2005 (Chapter 38 of the Statutes of 2005) appropriated funds for the department to contract for a teacher data system feasibility study to determine the feasibility of converting existing data systems into an integrated, comprehensive, longitudinally linked teacher information system that can yield high-quality program evaluations.

(5) It is important that policymakers and teacher candidates have access to information on the quality of teacher preparation programs. It is also the intent of the Legislature that the quality indicators include the extent to which teachers are prepared to work effectively with all pupils, including, but not necessarily limited to, English language learners, special education pupils, and socioeconomically disadvantaged pupils.

(6) It is the intent of the Legislature that, as the California Education
 Information System is implemented over time, access to public information already available on various measures of the quality of teacher preparation programs be available in electronic format and be accessible to the extent practicable through downloadable pages and reports accessible to the public in a consolidated manner.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the vital goals described in this section be accomplished through the establishment of a comprehensive state education data information system in the department that includes information regarding the teacher workforce.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 248, Sec. 1.   (AB 2086)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10601.

(a) There has been developed by the department the California Education Information System, hereinafter in this chapter called “the system.” The function of the system is to establish, conduct, and by continuous concern keep up to date a basic, integrated, statewide information system for education.

(b) The system includes both of the following:

(1) The California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 60900) of Part 33, which maintains pupil data regarding demographic, program participation, enrollment, and statewide assessments, in addition to data contained in the California Basic Educational Data System,
 including certificated staff information collected through the Professional Assignment Information Form prepared by the department.

(2) The California Longitudinal Teacher Integrated Data Education System developed pursuant to Section 10601.5, which enables analysis of workforce trends, evaluation of teacher preparation programs, and the monitoring of teacher assignments. The California Longitudinal Teacher Integrated Data Education System shall maintain data regarding the certificated workforce that is not maintained in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System and consolidate data that is collected by state agencies and local educational agencies.

(c) Data elements and codes included in the system shall be maintained in compliance with all of the following:

(1) Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section
 49060) of Part 27 and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(2) Section 49602.

(3) Section 56347.

(4) The Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).

(5) The federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g) and any federal regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(6) Any other applicable federal or state law that can be interpreted as protecting the privacy and confidentiality of individual pupils or certificated personnel.

(d) The department shall adopt regulations to implement this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 159, Sec. 1.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10601.5.

(a) The department, in collaboration with the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, shall contract for the development of a teacher data system to be known as the California Longitudinal Teacher Integrated Data Education System that is based on the results of the teacher data system feasibility study conducted pursuant to Item 6110-001-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2005 (Chapter 38 of the Statutes of 2005). The purpose of the California Longitudinal Teacher Integrated Data Education System is to streamline processes, improve the efficiency of data collection by the department, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, and the Employment Development Department, and improve the quality of data collected from local educational agencies and teacher preparation programs. The
 California Longitudinal Teacher Integrated Data Education System shall be developed and implemented in accordance with all state rules and regulations governing information technology projects.

(b) The California Longitudinal Teacher Integrated Data Education System shall serve as the central state repository of information regarding the teacher workforce in the state for purposes of developing and reviewing state policy, identifying workforce trends, and identifying future needs regarding the teaching workforce. It also shall serve to provide high-quality program evaluations, including evaluation of the effectiveness of teacher preparation and induction, and to help improve professional development programs. Additionally, it shall promote the efficient monitoring of teacher assignments as required by state and federal law.

(c) The California Longitudinal Teacher Integrated Data
 Education System shall not include the names, social security numbers, home addresses, telephone numbers, or e-mail addresses of individual teachers.

(d) Data in the California Longitudinal Teacher Integrated Data Education System shall not be used in violation of any federal or state law that is intended to protect an individual’s right to privacy or the confidentiality of an individual’s personal information.

(e) The system shall be used to accomplish all of the following goals:

(1) Provide a means to evaluate all of the following:

(A) The effectiveness of teacher preparation programs, including, but not limited to, traditional fifth-year programs, university internship programs, and district-sponsored internship programs.

(B) Teacher workforce issues, including mobility, retention, and attrition.

(2) Streamline and improve the effectiveness and timeliness of assignment monitoring as required by the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.) and by state law.

(3) Enable local educational agencies to monitor teacher assignments on demand.

(f) For purposes of implementing this chapter, including the legislative intent expressed in subdivision (b) of Section 10600, the system shall include all of the following information:

(1) Age profiles of teachers in the workforce.

(2) Projections of the number of retirees in the
 education system over the next 10 years throughout the state.

(3) Identification of subject matter fields that have the severest shortage of teachers.

(4) Geographic distribution of teachers by credential type.

(5) Present patterns of in-service education for teachers.

(g) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing and accredited teacher preparation programs shall participate in the system by providing available data regarding enrollment in credential programs, credentials issued in each specialization, and certificated persons in each specialty who are not employed in education, and by collaborating with the department in the design and preparation of periodic reports of teacher supply and demand in each specialty and in each geographic region of the
 state.

(h) The California Longitudinal Teacher Integrated Data Education System shall do all of the following:

(1) Utilize and maximize use of existing teacher databases.

(2) Maintain longitudinally linked data without including the names of teachers.

(3) Comply with all state and federal confidentiality and privacy laws.

(i) The Superintendent shall convene a working group to provide advice and guidance on the development and implementation of the system. The group shall include, but is not limited to, representatives from the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, the Employment Development Department, the president of the state
 board or his or her designee, and representatives of local educational agencies, postsecondary educational institutions, researchers, teachers, administrators, and parents.

(j) The operation of the California Longitudinal Teacher Integrated Data Education System is contingent upon the appropriation of funds for purposes of this section in the annual Budget Act or other legislation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 347, Sec. 11.   (SB 942)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10601.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, data in the California Education Information System, solely or in conjunction with data from any other data system, may be used by local educational agencies for purposes of evaluating teachers and administrators and making employment decisions, only if these decisions comply with Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 2.   (SB 1 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10602.

In maintaining the system, the department shall:

(a) Consult and cooperate with school districts, county superintendents, advisory committees on integrated data processing, task forces for implementing the utilization of a statewide information system, intergovernmental boards on electronic data processing and state electronic data processing policy committees created by statute or by executive order of the Governor.

(b) Cooperate with the Educational Management and Evaluation Commission in all matters relating to program budgeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

10603.

The department may consult and cooperate with public and private agencies and with educators and information specialists at the district, county, regional, state, and national levels.

The department may enter into nonexclusive licenses with public and private agencies within or outside of the state to permit the use of the copyrighted system and may contract with such agencies to perform any of the functions set forth in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

10604.

School districts maintaining kindergarten or any grade of grades 1 through 12, county superintendents of schools, and the department shall:

(a) Cooperate and consult in the joint conduct of the system.

(b) Coordinate information-processing activities to preclude duplication of the developmental and operational aspects of the system.

(c) Conduct educational information-processing activities in accordance with regulations of the State Board of Education adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

10606.

The department shall, among other things:

(a) Develop for statewide educational use standards for:

(1) Coding structures.

(2) Common data base.

(3) File layout and design.

(4) Flow charts.

(5) Identification of data items.

(6) Input documentation and formats.

(7) Output report formats, including those required by local, county, state, and federal agencies.

(8) Procedural manuals.

(9) Terminology.

(10) Other relevant material.

(b) Make available, without charge, to school districts, county superintendents, and other public agencies the system components, described in subdivision (a), as they are completed.

(c) Identify centers to develop or demonstrate the appropriate use of the system and the system’s procedures, those districts, county superintendents, and other public agencies that are successfully using the various components of the system.

(d) Establish safeguards to assure only appropriate access to confidential information.

(e) Disseminate information about the system, and its use and availability.

(f) Adopt regulations to implement this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

10607.

The regulations adopted pursuant to Section 10606 shall, among other things:

(a) Require that the department and school districts use the system’s standard terminology and formats specified in Section 10606 as the basis for all reports and other data specified in this code and related administrative codes.

(b) Provide departmental coordination in order to preclude costly duplication of the developmental and operational aspects of materials, equipment, programming, systems and procedures.

(c) Recognize that wise and appropriate use of automatic data-processing technology need not be restricted by school district or other boundaries.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a school district or county office of education shall not be required to comply with a requirement in any other section of this code that information be reported to the State Department of Education with regard to information that is reported to the department under the CBEDS report. For purposes of this section, “CBEDS report” means the report that is transmitted by public educational agencies to the State Department of Education for purposes of the California Basic Education Data System and includes the information reported under this chapter, and other information relating to school staff and pupil enrollment. However, the Legislature recognizes that there are circumstances when more timely information is necessary prior to the annual CBEDS collection. Under this condition, the State Department of Education may require the districts and county offices of education to provide the necessary information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 507, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.

The department may accept federal or other funds for the purpose of financing activities pursuant to this article. School districts and county offices of education may assign to the department funds or other resources which may be identified in their budgets for planning, developing, or coordinating activities related to this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

10610.

The State Board of Education shall make recommendations to the Legislature as the state board deems appropriate concerning appropriate or necessary legislation related to this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7.5. JOINT DATA SYSTEMS [10700. - 10700.]

10700.

It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation that will develop a coordinated adult education data system that accomplishes all of the following:

(a) Uses standardized procedures to collect data.

(b) Complies with relevant federal statutes in elementary, secondary, and postsecondary education.

(c) Makes efficient use of existing data systems in the California Community College system and the department.

(d) Is based upon individual pupil and student records that, preferably, can be linked through the use of a common student identifier.

(e) Contains a common data dictionary that can be used to provide valid, comparable data regarding enrollment, demographics, outcomes, and other educational or economic policy issues.

(f) Complies with all relevant state and federal privacy laws and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 264, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Education Data and Information Act of 2008 [10800. - 10807.]

10800.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Education Data and Information Act of 2008.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 561, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10801.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the design and implementation of a high-quality, comprehensive, and longitudinal education data system for California will do the following:

(a) Support a system of continuous learning by delivering timely, reliable, user-friendly, and relevant information to schoolsite and district leaders, county offices of education, higher education leaders, teachers and faculty, education program providers, policymakers, researchers, parents, pupils, and the public at large.

(b) Provide educators and parents with the tools, reports, and assistance needed to inform instruction and learning.

(c) Integrate data from disparate sources.

(d) Anticipate and provide the technological capacity for the sharing of appropriate noneducation data from other state sources such as health, welfare, juvenile justice, corrections, and employment agencies, the analysis of which is necessary to fully understand critical education policy and education finance questions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 561, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10802.

(a) The department shall establish a process by which local educational agencies issue, maintain, and report information using the unique statewide pupil identifiers specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 60900 for state and federally funded center-based child care and development programs under their purview.

(b) In order to comply with the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) assurances delineated in Section 6401(e)(2) of the America COMPETES Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 9871), the department shall establish the process referenced in subdivision (a) no later than January 1, 2011.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that on or before January 1, 2011, the department, at a minimum, ensures that the data elements pertaining to preschool described in Section 6401(e)(2)(D) of the America COMPETES Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 9871) be collected for all preschool programs operated by a local educational agency.

(d) Except to the extent required by federal law, or as needed to ensure compliance with federal law, the department shall not require these center-based child care and development programs to implement or maintain unique pupil identifiers specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 60900 until an appropriation for this purpose is provided in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 2.   (SB 2 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10802.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, on or before January 1, 2011, and to the extent an appropriation is provided for this purpose, the department, at a minimum, ensures that the data elements pertaining to success in the 21st Century workforce described in Section 6401(a)(2)(B)(ii) and (e)(1)(A)(ii) of the federal America COMPETES Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 9871) be collected for career technical education programs operated by a local educational agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 3.   (SB 1 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10803.

(a) The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges, the University of California, and the California State University shall each establish a process by which colleges and universities within those systems issue, maintain, and report information using the unique statewide pupil identifiers specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 60900.

(b) Annually, on or before April 1, the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges, the University of California, and the California State University shall provide a progress report to the Governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature. The report shall include a detailed timeline for the implementation, maintenance, and use of the unique statewide pupil identifiers pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 561, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10804.

(a) The State Chief Information Officer appointed pursuant to Section 11545 of the Government Code shall convene a working group representing, at a minimum, the state board, the Superintendent, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the University of California, the California State University, and any other governmental entities that collect, report, or use individual pupil education data that would become part of the comprehensive education data system. The State Chief Information Officer shall form an advisory committee to the working group that includes school and district administrators, teachers and faculty, education program providers, policymakers, researchers, parents, and pupils.

(b) The working group
 convened pursuant to this section shall create a strategic plan to link education data systems from all segments and to accomplish all of the following:

(1) Provide an overall structural design for the linked education data systems.

(2) Examine current state education data systems.

(3) Examine the protocols and procedures to be used by state agencies in data processing, including, but not limited to, collecting, storing, manipulating, sharing, retrieving, and releasing data so as to enable each state agency to accurately and efficiently collect and share data with the other state agencies while complying with all applicable state and federal privacy laws.

(4) Identify specific procedures and policies that would be necessary to ensure the privacy of
 pupil record information so as to meet both federal requirements and the higher expectations of privacy held by the state.

(5) Identify specific procedures and policies that would facilitate the sharing and transfer of data from one segment to another and ultimately to include linkages to workforce data.

(c) The strategic plan shall be delivered by the State Chief Information Officer to the Legislature and the Governor on or before January 1, 2010.
